Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.490

Required provision in residential orders.

Unless waived by court order, after June 8, 2000, every court order shall include a clear restatement of the provisions in RCW 26.09.430 through 26.09.480.

[ 2000 c 21 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—2000 c 21: See notes following RCW 26.09.405.